Wyoming, session 2026, HB0068.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-13-105(a)(vii), (b) and by
creating a new subsection (n) is amended to read:

39-13-105. Exemptions.

(a) The following persons who are bona fide Wyoming
residents for at least three (3) years at the time of
HB0068

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0020
claiming the exemption are entitled to receive the tax
exemption provided by W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv):

(vii) A disabled veteran with a compensable
service connected disability certified by the veterans
administration or a branch of the armed forces of the
United States. A veteran who is certified as having a
permanent and total service connected disability of one
hundred percent (100%) or as being totally and permanently
disabled as provided by rule of the department shall be
eligible for an exemption as provided in subsection (n) of
this section.

(b) Except as provided in subsection (n) of this
section, the exemption for veterans is limited to an annual
exemption of six thousand dollars ($6,000.00) of assessed
value.

(n) For a veteran who is certified as having a
permanent and total service connected disability of one
hundred percent (100%) or as being totally and permanently
disabled as provided by rule of the department, the
exemption under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv) shall be the full
HB0068

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0020
assessed value of the primary residence owned by the
veteran, including not more than ten (10) acres of
associated land. Notwithstanding any other provision of
this section, the surviving spouse of the disabled veteran
shall remain eligible for the exemption under this
subsection if the surviving spouse has not remarried and
the property remains the primary residence of the surviving
spouse. If a veteran or surviving spouse elects not to
accept or is not eligible for the exemption under this
subsection, the veteran or surviving spouse may still be
eligible for the exemption specified under subsection (b)
of this section as provided in this section.

Section 2. This act shall first apply to the tax year
beginning January 1, 2027.

Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0068